Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 11 Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act

Effective date. —

This chapter became effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (2016).

For article, “2019 Legislative Review,” see 24 Ga. St. B.J. 28 (June 2019).